Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Grain Dealer and Grain Warehouse Operator Licenses

251.340.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote the welfare of the Commonwealth and its people, and to provide economic stability for its agricultural and agribusiness industries, by:

Establishing a system of licensure for persons engaging in the business of grain dealing;

Establishing a system of licensure for persons engaging in the business of grain warehouse operating; and

Establishing a grain insurance fund of which the purpose is to:

Protect producers of fund-covered grains against risk of loss in the event of a licensed grain dealer’s or grain warehouse operator’s financial failure; and

Compensate eligible claimants of fund-covered grains for losses due to the failure of a licensed grain dealer or grain warehouse operator.

The board, in conjunction with the department, shall be responsible for adopting and overseeing the policies, procedures, and programs to effectuate the purposes identified in this section.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

251.345.
Licensee to issue scale ticket upon receipt of grain — Documents issued for received grain to be produced upon department’s request.

Upon receiving grain, a licensee shall issue a scale ticket to the depositor.

Upon request from a representative of the department, a licensee shall produce for inspection and copying the scale tickets and any other documents that were issued for received grain.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

251.350.
Scale ticket issued by licensed grain dealer or licensed grain warehouse operator, information required — Department-approved scales for weighing grain.

Every scale ticket issued by a licensed grain dealer or a licensed grain warehouse operator shall include the following information in writing:

A statement indicating whether the delivery was inbound or outbound;

The name of the depositor for inbound delivery or consignee for outbound delivery;

The date of delivery;

The name and street address of the location where the grain was delivered;

The quantity of the grain that was delivered, in bushels or pounds;

The kind and grade of grain delivered, unless its identity is preserved by placing it in a special bin or a special pile which has a unique or identifying mark that appears on the receipt;

A statement whether the grain is being sold at a specified price or being delivered pursuant to a forward pricing contract whose terms were pre-approved by a representative of the department; and

The scale ticket’s serial number.

Grain received by a licensee shall be weighed on department-approved scales.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

251.355.
Grain dealer license and grain warehouse operator license — Department’s authority to issue and administer licenses — Administrative regulations — Fees — Suspension or revocation of licenses.

No person shall be or act as a grain dealer in the Commonwealth without holding a valid grain dealer license issued by the department.

No person shall engage in the business of buying grain from producers for resale, milling, or processing in the Commonwealth without holding a valid grain dealer license issued by the department; provided, however, that no license shall be required in order to buy grain from sellers who are not producers of grain.

No person shall be or act as a grain warehouse operator in the Commonwealth without holding a valid grain warehouse operator license issued by the department.

No person shall own, control, operate, or manage any public warehouse in which grain is stored for compensation in the Commonwealth without holding a valid grain warehouse operator license issued by the department.

Any person who possesses unpaid-grain for more than thirty (30) days shall be deemed to be acting as a grain warehouse operator and shall be subject to the licensing and financial requirements for grain warehouse operators under the provisions of this chapter.

Licenses issued by the department shall be valid for a period of time not to exceed one (1) year and shall expire on June 30 each year.

A separate license shall be required for each facility in the Commonwealth.

The board, in conjunction with the department, shall promulgate administrative regulations setting forth a schedule of fees for licensed grain warehouse operators. Any changes to the schedule of fees shall be approved by a majority vote of the board. The schedule of fees shall be reviewed by the board at least one (1) time every four (4) years. The annual increase in board-approved license fees shall be limited to five percent (5%) and shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) over any four (4) year period.

The board, in conjunction with the department, shall promulgate administrative regulations setting forth a schedule of fees for licensed grain dealers. Any changes to the schedule of fees shall be approved by a majority vote of the board. The schedule of fees shall be reviewed by the board at least one (1) time every four (4) years. The annual increase in board-approved license fees shall be limited to five percent (5%) and shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) over any four (4) year period.

The department shall have the authority to suspend or revoke a license if the board or department determines the licensee has violated a provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated under this chapter.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 7, effective August 1, 2019.

251.360.
Grain dealer or grain warehouse operator license fees — Use of fees — Prohibited use of fees.

Receipts collected from grain dealer or grain warehouse operator licensing fees shall be used by the department to offset the cost of:

The salary and benefits for employees in the department’s Division of Regulation and Inspection; and

The vehicles, mileage, training, legal fees, accounting fees, and other expenses incurred by the department or the board in connection with the provisions authorized by this chapter.

Receipts collected from grain dealer or grain warehouse operator licensing fees shall not be deposited in, or used to pay expenses incurred in connection with, the administration of the Kentucky grain insurance fund.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

251.365.
Evidence of financial responsibility to be filed by applicant or licensee — Security required.

The department shall not issue or renew a grain dealer or grain warehouse operator license under this chapter until the applicant or licensee has filed with the department satisfactory evidence of financial responsibility.

Evidence of financial responsibility shall:

Consist of:

A surety bond, executed by the applicant as principal, and issued by a corporate surety authorized to conduct business in this state;

A certificate of deposit issued by a federally insured financial institution in this state;

An irrevocable letter of credit issued by a federally insured financial institution in this state;

Other security, as deemed acceptable by the department; or

Any combination of subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph, so long as the aggregate value of the evidence meets the requirements of this section;

Be made payable to the board;

Be in an amount meeting the requirements of this section;

In the case of a bond, be conditioned upon the faithful performance of:

All obligations of a licensee under the terms of this chapter and any administrative regulations promulgated under it, from the effective date of the bond until the license is revoked, denied, or suspended or the bond is canceled, whichever comes first; and

Any obligations the applicant or licensee may contract for with producers, depositors, or other persons placing grains in the applicant’s or licensee’s facilities, from the effective date of the bond and thereafter, regardless of whether or not the applicant’s or licensee’s facility remains the subject of a valid license;

Be filed with and remain in possession of the department until it is released, canceled, or discharged as provided for by the terms of this chapter and any administrative regulations promulgated under it;

Be kept in force at all times while the licensee is operating as a grain warehouse operator or grain dealer. Failure to keep the bond or other security in force shall be cause for revocation of the license, and shall subject the licensee to criminal penalties set forth in KRS

251.990

; and

Contain a provision stating that it may not be canceled by any party, except upon ninety (90) days’ notice in writing to the department. A notice of cancellation shall not affect any liability accrued before the expiration of the notice period.

Separate proof of financial responsibility shall be required for each facility that is licensed by the department.

For any security used as evidence under subsection (2) of this section that bears interest, the interest shall be made payable to the purchaser of the security.

No person may release, cancel, or discharge security filed with the department under subsection (1) of this section without prior approval of the department and its approval of a substitute bond or other security.

If the department questions a licensee’s ability to pay producers and depositors for grain, or if the department determines that the licensee does not have a sufficient net worth to meet the licensee’s financial obligations, the department shall require the licensee to file additional security with the department in an amount equal to the insufficiency. Failure to post the additional security shall constitute grounds for suspension or revocation of a license.

The amount of the security required by subsection (1) of this section shall be in a principal amount, to the nearest one thousand dollars ($1,000), that is equal to ten percent (10%) of:

For a licensed grain dealer, the aggregate dollar amount:

That was paid by the dealer for grain purchased in the dealer’s most recently completed fiscal year; or

That the department estimates will be paid by the grain dealer for grain purchased in the grain dealer’s current fiscal year, if records for the grain dealer’s most recently completed fiscal year do not exist or are not available; and

For a licensed grain warehouse operator, the aggregate dollar value of:

The grain deposited in the grain warehouse operator’s most recently completed fiscal year; or

The grain the department estimates will be deposited in the operator’s warehouse during the current fiscal year, if records for the warehouse operator’s most recently completed fiscal year do not exist or are not available.

In no event shall the required security for a licensee be less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) nor more than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 9, effective August 1, 2019.

251.370.
Licensees using paper documents or electronic documents — Business records required — Retention schedule — Accounting functions — Financial statements — Administrative regulations.

A licensee using paper scale tickets, settlement sheets, or purchase contracts shall comply with the following requirements:

Documents shall be pre-numbered sequentially; and

Settlement sheet information shall be cross-referenced with scale tickets.

A licensee using electronic scale tickets, settlement sheets, purchase contracts, or other documents shall conform to the formats and procedures required by the department.

A licensee shall provide, and make available to the department or the board, a complete and accurate set of business records, including:

Records of all transactions, including records and accounts of all grains received and withdrawn or delivered;

Records, filed in numerical order, of all scale tickets, warehouse receipts, and settlement sheets that have been issued, voiced, or lost; and

Copies of contracts for the sale or storage of grain.

A licensee shall retain its business records for a minimum of four (4) years.

A licensed grain warehouse operator shall retain copies, either digitally or on paper, of warehouse receipts or other documents evidencing ownership of any grain, or any liability of the grain warehouse operator, so long as such documents evidence a valid ownership interest or debt. A licensee shall retain copies of such documents for a period of not less than four (4) years from the date when the ownership interest or debt was extinguished.

A licensee’s accounting functions shall be performed in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

A licensee’s business records shall accurately identify any liens or encumbrances on grain that is held or owned by the licensee.

Upon request by the board, a licensee or applicant for a license shall provide to the department either:

A review engagement report issued by an independent certified public accountant stating whether, based on the review, he or she is aware of any material modifications that should be made to the financial statements in order for them to be in accordance with the applicable reporting framework; or

An audit and written report issued by an independent certified public accountant expressing an opinion whether the financial statements are presented fairly, in all material aspects, in accordance with the applicable financial reporting framework.

The board, in conjunction with the department, shall have authority to promulgate administrative regulations setting forth additional recordkeeping requirements for licensees.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 10, effective August 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

251.375.
Forward pricing contracts — Requirements governing — Administrative regulations.

No licensee shall enter into forward pricing contracts without first attaining approval from the department to enter into these contracts. A licensee entering into forward pricing contracts shall keep any records and ledgers the department deems necessary to document the licensee’s obligations.

A licensee that has entered into a forward pricing contract shall make a copy available for inspection by the department or the board upon request.

Forward pricing contracts shall be in writing.

The board, in conjunction with the department, shall promulgate administrative regulations setting forth the minimum information that shall be included in any forward pricing contract entered into by a licensee.

By the tenth day of each month, any licensee that has entered into a forward pricing contract shall submit to the department a report accurately reflecting its position on the last day of the previous month.

A licensee which has entered into one (1) or more forward pricing contracts shall maintain at least eighty percent (80%) of the value of the licensee’s unpaid obligations for all grain purchased under forward pricing contracts, using one (1) or more of the following:

Grain maintained in storage in the licensee’s warehouse or other storage facilities;

Rights to grain as evidenced by a warehouse receipt or scale ticket for storage of the grain under an agreement with another warehouse approved by a representative of the department; or

Proceeds from the sale of grain as evidenced by one (1) or more of the following:

Funds held in a separate account, designated for the benefit of unpaid sellers of grain that was delivered under forward pricing contracts, in a state or federally licensed financial institution or a lending agency of the Farm Credit Administration;

Short-term investments held in time accounts, designated for the benefit of unpaid sellers of grain that was delivered under forward pricing contracts, in a state or federally licensed financial institution or a lending agency of the Farm Credit Administration; or

Other evidence of unencumbered security or assets acceptable to the department, including but not limited to an irrevocable letter of credit or surety bond.

If the department or the board determines that a licensee does not have sufficient net worth to satisfy the indebtedness, the department shall prohibit the transfer or disbursement of any grain, property, or assets except for the satisfaction of unpaid obligations for grain that was delivered under forward pricing contracts. Disbursements of payments to sellers shall be made on a pro rata basis of the value of the remaining grain.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 11, effective August 1, 2019.

251.380.
Periodic inspections of licensed grain warehouses and licensed grain dealers — Correction of deficiencies.

The department shall inspect each licensed grain warehouse at least two (2) times each year. The department’s inspection shall include:

A determination whether the grain in storage is properly accounted for;

An assessment of the storage facilities for fitness; and

An assessment of the condition of the grain in storage.

The department shall permit a licensee to store grain at another facility that is licensed and located in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, if the requirements for a surety bond or other evidence of financial responsibility set forth in KRS

251.365

are satisfied.

A licensee that is short of grain may cover the shortage by:

Acquiring additional bond on one hundred percent (100%) of the value of the grain; or

Depositing the shortage value of the grain into a special account that is payable jointly to the licensee and the department.

The department may allow a licensee that is short of grain to substitute one (1) type of grain for another type of grain on a dollar-for-dollar basis.

The department shall inspect each licensed grain dealer at least one (1) time each year. The department’s inspection shall include:

An inspection of the licensee’s scale tickets, settlements, and canceled checks; and

Verification that payments are made by the dealer within thirty (30) days of the completion of delivery.

A licensee that is short of grain shall correct any deficiencies identified by the department within the deadline mandated by the department.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 12, effective August 1, 2019.

251.385.
Fund-covered grains, defined — Approval of fund-covered grain status by board required.

The following grains shall be fund-covered grains:

Corn, wheat, soybeans, grain sorghums, rye, barley, oats, or popcorn; and

Other grains that may be approved for “fund-covered grain status” by a majority vote of the board.

The board shall not approve for “fund-covered grain status” any grain that is not publicly traded on at least one (1) exchange in the United States or Canada.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 13, effective August 1, 2019.

251.390.
Kentucky grain insurance fund — Eligibility for coverage — Notice of intent not to be covered by fund, effect of.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any claimant who delivers fund-covered grain to a licensed grain dealer or licensed grain warehouse operator shall be eligible for coverage by the fund without regard to whether the claimant resides in Kentucky or another state.

Any person who submits to the department, not later than January 31, a written notice of intent not to be covered by the fund, shall:

Be entitled to receive from the board a refund of any assessments collected from that person pursuant to KRS

251.640

during the course of that calendar year; and

Remain ineligible for coverage and compensation by the fund for any grain that may be delivered by or on behalf of that person to any licensee during the course of that calendar year.

By submitting a timely written notice of intent not to be covered by the fund as provided under subsection (2) of this section, a person foregoes any protection or eligibility for compensation from the fund for grain that may be delivered during the course of that calendar year. The written notice shall:

Be effective with respect to eligibility for coverage only to the fund-covered grain delivered in that calendar year; and

Not have any effect with respect to eligibility for coverage for fund-covered grain delivered in previous calendar years or in subsequent calendar years.

Any person who does not submit to the department, on or before January 31, a written notification of intent not to be covered by the fund shall:

Not be entitled to receive a refund of any assessments that may be collected from that person pursuant to KRS

251.640

during the course of that calendar year; and

Remain eligible for coverage by the fund for any fund-covered grain delivered by or on behalf of that person to any licensee during the course of that calendar year.

Any person who submits a written notice of intent not to be covered by the fund shall be deemed also to have given notice of intent not to be covered to the extent of his, her, or its ownership interest in any other entities in which he, she, or it holds such an interest.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 14, effective August 1, 2019.

251.395.
Lien on grain stored with grain warehouse operator — Relation to other liens or security interests — Filing of notice not required to perfect — Discharge of lien.

When a depositor stores grain with a grain warehouse operator and has written evidence of ownership disclosing a storage obligation, the producer or other depositor has a first priority lien on the grain, the proceeds from the grain, or on grain owned by the grain warehouse operator. The lien terminates when the storage liability of the grain warehouse operator to the depositor terminates.

The lien created under this section shall be preferred to any lien or security interest of any creditor to the grain warehouse operator, regardless of whether the creditor’s lien or security interest was attached to the grain or proceeds before or after the date on which the producer or other depositor’s lien was attached.

A depositor who claims a lien under this section need not file any notice of the lien in order to perfect the lien.

The lien created under this section is discharged, except as to the proceeds therefrom and except as to grain owned by the grain warehouse operator, upon sale of the grain by the warehouse operator to a buyer in the ordinary course of business.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 15, effective August 1, 2019.

251.400.
Powers and duties of board upon failure involving licensed grain dealer or licensed grain warehouse operator — When claimant deemed to have assigned all rights, title, and interest to the board.

When the board determines there has been a failure involving a licensed grain dealer or licensed grain warehouse operator, the board shall have the authority to:

Take receivership of any grain on the licensee’s premises to ensure that it is not destroyed, lost, stolen, or otherwise disposed of;

Sell the grain and place the proceeds in escrow for the benefit of the owners, or for the benefits of claimants, when the identities of those persons have been identified;

Establish a priority lien on any grain or other assets that remain in the licensee’s possession, custody, or control;

Secure and take possession of any grains or other commodities in the possession, custody, or control of the failed grain dealer or grain warehouse operator for the purpose of using it to cover outstanding storage obligations. If there is insufficient grain to cover outstanding shortage obligations, the board shall determine each depositor’s pro rata share of the value of the remaining grain. Any remaining deficiency shall be considered a claim of the producer or depositor against the fund, if applicable. Each grade of grain shall be treated separately for the purpose of covering outstanding storage obligations and calculating claims against the fund;

Commence action upon the surety bond, certificate of deposit, letter of credit, or temporary surety as required by KRS

251.365

. The board may commence action against both the licensee and the surety or other financial institution in the Franklin Circuit Court or a Circuit Court in the county where the grain is located;

Deposit into the fund any remaining assets of the failed grain dealer or grain warehouse operator for the purpose of using those assets to pay claimants;

Establish a period of time, not less than thirty (30) days and not greater than one (1) year, for potential claimants to file their claims with supporting documentation;

Make a public announcement of the procedure and deadline for potential claimants to file their claims;

Examine timely filed claims and make such investigation as may be necessary for the board to determine whether a claim is a valid claim;

Determine which of the claims that were submitted in advance of the deadline are valid claims;

Assign to each valid claim an initial value computed as a percentage of the value of the grain on the date when it was delivered by the claimant to the licensee, relying on the value established for that grain by the Chicago Board of Trade on the date of delivery. If there is no price information from the Chicago Board of Trade for that grain on that date, then the board shall rely on price information from another exchange in the United States or Canada. If there is no price information from any exchange in the United States or Canada for that grain on that date, the board shall determine an alternative method for determining a value for that grain on that date;

Compute claim values by applying these percentages to each valid claim’s initial value:

One hundred percent (100%), for valid claims that are evidenced by a grain warehouse receipt issued by a federally licensed warehouse; or

A minimum of ninety percent (90%), for all other valid claims; and

Notify each claimant in writing of the board’s determination as to:

The validity of the claim;

The value of the grain claimed by the claimant;

The amount and percent of value that will be reimbursed by the fund; and

The claimant’s right to request a hearing on his or her claim within thirty (30) days of the claimant’s receipt of the written notification.

The board shall not approve for payment from the fund any claims with respect to grains that are not fund-covered grains.

The board shall not compute a claim’s value in reliance on the price or other terms of agreement between a claimant and a licensee.

If a producer or other depositor fails to file a claim within the time announced by the board, then the board and the fund shall not be liable to that depositor.

If the board fails to commence action against the surety bond, certificate of deposit, letter of credit, or temporary surety that KRS

251.365

required the licensee to obtain within thirty (30) days of a depositor making a written demand that the board commence action, then the depositor shall have a right of action against the licensee to recover damages suffered by reason of the licensee’s failure. The depositor shall give the board immediate written notice of the commencement of such action.

The board shall deny payment from the fund to a claimant when the board determines that the claimant:

Elected to opt out of coverage, as permitted by KRS

251.390

; or

Engaged in conduct or practices which substantially contributed to the claimant’s financial loss.

A claimant who accepts payment from the fund shall be deemed to have assigned to the board all of the claimant’s rights, title, and interest in the grain and in any judgment with respect to the grain. The board shall have the authority to initiate or maintain any civil action it deems necessary to compel a licensee or a former licensee to repay to the fund any sums disbursed therefrom in relation to a claim.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 16, effective August 1, 2019.

251.405.
Rights of persons injured by violation of any provisions of this chapter.

Any person injured by the violation of any provision in this chapter may bring an action against the person or corporation that committed the violation to recover damages sustained due to the violation without regard to whether or not the person or corporation committing the violation has been subjected to other civil or criminal penalties.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 88, § 17, effective August 1, 2019.